California statutes. Water Code
(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that state and local land use actions identified as “covered actions” pursuant to Section 85057.5 be consistent with the Delta Plan. This section’s findings, policies, and goals apply to Delta land use planning and development.

(b) The actions of the council shall be guided by the findings, policies, and goals expressed in this section when reviewing decisions
 of the commission pursuant to Division 19.5 (commencing with Section 29700) of the Public Resources Code.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Delta is a distinct and valuable natural resource of vital and enduring interest to all the people and exists as a delicately balanced estuary and wetland ecosystem of hemispheric importance.

(2) The permanent protection of the Delta’s natural and scenic resources is the paramount concern to present and future residents of the state and nation.

(3) To promote the public safety, health, and welfare, and to protect public and private property, wildlife, fisheries, and the natural environment, it is necessary to protect and enhance the ecosystem of the Delta and prevent its further
 deterioration and destruction.

(4) Existing developed uses, and future developments that are carefully planned and developed consistent with the policies of this division, are essential to the economic and social well-being of the people of this state and especially to persons living and working in the Delta.

(d) The fundamental goals for managing land use in the Delta are to do all of the following:

(1) Protect, maintain, enhance, and, where feasible, restore the overall quality of the Delta environment and its natural and artificial resources.

(2) Ensure the utilization and conservation of Delta resources, taking into account the social and economic needs of the people of the state.

(3) Maximize public access to Delta resources and maximize public recreational opportunities in the Delta consistent with sound resources conservation principles and constitutionally protected rights of private property owners.

(4) Encourage state and local initiatives and cooperation in preparing procedures to implement coordinated planning and development for mutually beneficial uses, including educational uses, in the Delta.

(5) Develop new or improved aquatic and terrestrial habitat and protect existing habitats to advance the goal of restoring and enhancing the Delta ecosystem.

(6) Improve water quality to protect human health and the environment consistent with achieving water quality objectives in the Delta.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85023.

The longstanding constitutional principle of reasonable use and the public trust doctrine shall be the foundation of state water management policy and are particularly important and applicable to the Delta.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Miscellaneous Provisions [85031. - 85034.]

85031.

(a) This division does not diminish, impair, or otherwise affect in any manner whatsoever any area of origin, watershed of origin, county of origin, or any other water rights protections, including, but not limited to, rights to water appropriated prior to December 19, 1914, provided under the law. This division does not limit or otherwise affect the application of Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 1215) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2, Sections 10505, 10505.5, 11128, 11460, 11461, 11462, and 11463, and Sections 12200 to 12220, inclusive.

(b) For the purposes of this division, an area that utilizes water that has been diverted and conveyed from the Sacramento River hydrologic region, for use outside the Sacramento
 River hydrologic region or the Delta, shall not be deemed to be immediately adjacent thereto or capable of being conveniently supplied with water therefrom by virtue or on account of the diversion and conveyance of that water through facilities that may be constructed for that purpose after January 1, 2010.

(c) Nothing in this division supersedes, limits, or otherwise modifies the applicability of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1700) of Part 2 of Division 2, including petitions related to any new conveyance constructed or operated in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 85320) of Part 4.

(d) Unless otherwise expressly provided, nothing in this division supersedes, reduces, or otherwise affects existing legal protections, both procedural and substantive, relating to the state board’s regulation of diversion and use of water, including, but not limited to, water
 right priorities, the protection provided to municipal interests by Sections 106 and 106.5, and changes in water rights. Nothing in this division expands or otherwise alters the board’s existing authority to regulate the diversion and use of water or the courts’ existing concurrent jurisdiction over California water rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 315.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

85032.

This division does not affect any of the following:

(a) The Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code).

(b) The California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code).

(c) The Fish and Game Code.

(d) The Porter-Cologne Water Quality Control Act (Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000).

(e) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12930) of Part 6 of Division 6.

(f) The California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(g) Section 1702.

(h) The application of the public trust doctrine.

(i) Any water right.

(j) The liability of the state for flood protection in the Delta or its watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85034.

(a) (1) The council shall administer all contracts, grants, easements, and agreements made or entered into by the California Bay-Delta Authority under Division 26.4 (commencing with Section 79400), as that division read on December 31, 2009.

(2) The exercise of the authority described in paragraph (1) is not subject to review or approval by the Department of General Services.

(3) A contract, lease, license, or any other agreement to which the California Bay-Delta Authority is a party is not void or voidable as a result of the implementation of this subdivision, but shall continue in full force and effect until the end of its term.

(b) The council shall be the successor to and shall assume from the California Bay-Delta Authority all of the administrative rights, abilities, obligations, and duties of that authority.

(c) The council shall have possession and control of all records, papers, equipment, supplies, contracts, leases, agreements, and other property, real or personal, connected with the administration of Division 26.4 (commencing with Section 79400), as that division read on December 31, 2009, or held for the benefit or use of the California Bay-Delta Authority.

(d) The council shall assume from the California Bay-Delta Authority all responsibility to manage, in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 85280) of Part 3, the science program element that was required to be undertaken by Division 26.4 (commencing with Section
 79400), as that division read on December 31, 2009.

(e) Consistent with the responsibilities and duties assumed by the council pursuant to this section, all staff, resources, and funding within the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for the support of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program are hereby transferred to, and may be expended for the purposes of, the council. The executive officer of the council shall confer with the Director of Fish and Game, the director of the department, and the executive director of the board regarding possible reallocation of the staff and resources. The status, position, and rights of any officer or employee shall not be affected by this transfer and all officers and employees shall be retained pursuant to the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 316.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Definitions [85050. - 85067.]

85050.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85051.

“Acquisition” means the acquisition of a fee interest or any other interest, including easements, leases, and development rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85052.

“Adaptive management” means a framework and flexible decisionmaking process for ongoing knowledge acquisition, monitoring, and evaluation leading to continuous improvement in management planning and implementation of a project to achieve specified objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85053.

“Bay Delta Conservation Plan” or “BDCP” means a multispecies conservation plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85054.

“Coequal goals” means the two goals of providing a more reliable water supply for California and protecting, restoring, and enhancing the Delta ecosystem. The coequal goals shall be achieved in a manner that protects and enhances the unique cultural, recreational, natural resource, and agricultural values of the Delta as an evolving place.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85055.

“Commission” means the Delta Protection Commission established in Division 19.5 (commencing with Section 29700) of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85056.

“Conservancy” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy established in Section 32320 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85057.

“Council” means the Delta Stewardship Council established in Section 85200.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85057.5.

(a) “Covered action” means a plan, program, or project as defined pursuant to Section 21065 of the Public Resources Code that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Will occur, in whole or in part, within the boundaries of the Delta or Suisun Marsh.

(2) Will be carried out, approved, or funded by the state or a local public agency.

(3) Is covered by one or more provisions of the Delta Plan.

(4) Will have a significant impact on achievement of one or both of the coequal goals or the implementation of government-sponsored flood control programs to reduce risks to people,
 property, and state interests in the Delta.

(b) “Covered action” does not include any of the following:

(1) A regulatory action of a state agency.

(2) Routine maintenance and operation of the State Water Project or the federal Central Valley Project.

(3) Regional transportation plans prepared pursuant to Section 65080 of the Government Code.

(4) A plan, program, project, or activity within the secondary zone of the Delta that the applicable metropolitan planning organization pursuant to Section 65080 of the Government Code has determined is consistent with either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy that the State Air Resources Board has determined would,
 if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets established by that board pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code. For purposes of this paragraph, “consistent with” means consistent with the use designation, density, building intensity, transportation plan, and applicable policies specified for the area in the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative planning strategy, as applicable, and any infrastructure necessary to support the plan, program, project, or activity.

(5) Routine maintenance and operation of a facility located, in whole or in part, in the Delta, that is owned or operated by a local public agency.

(6) A plan, program, project, or activity that occurs, in whole or in part, in the Delta, if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The plan, program, project, or activity is undertaken by a local public agency that is located, in whole or in part, in the Delta.

(B) Either a notice of determination is filed, pursuant to Section 21152 of the Public Resources Code, for the plan, program, project, or activity by, or the plan, program, project, or activity is fully permitted by, September 30, 2009.

(7) (A) A project within the secondary zone, as defined pursuant to Section 29731 of the Public Resources Code as of January 1, 2009, for which a notice of approval or determination pursuant to Section 21152 of the Public Resources Code has been filed before the date on which the Delta Plan becomes effective.

(B) A project for which a notice of approval or determination
 is filed on or after the date on which the final Bay Delta Conservation Plan becomes effective, and before the date on which the Delta Plan becomes effective, is not a covered action but shall be consistent with the Bay Delta Conservation Plan.

(C) Subparagraphs (A) and (B) do not apply to either of the following:

(i) A project that is within a Restoration Opportunity Area as shown in Figure 3.1 of Chapter 3: Draft Conservation Strategy of the Bay Delta Conservation Plan, August 3, 2009, or as shown in a final Bay Delta Conservation Plan.

(ii) A project that is within the alignment of a conveyance facility as shown in Figures 1 to 5, inclusive, of the Final Draft Initial Assessment of Dual Delta Water Conveyance Report, April 23, 2008, and in future revisions of this document by the department.

(8) Leases approved by a special district if all of the following apply:

(A) The uses proposed by the lease are authorized by the applicable general plan and zoning ordinances of the city where the special district is located.

(B) The uses proposed by the lease are approved by the city where the special district is located and the city complies with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 85225) of Part 3, if applicable, prior to approval of the lease by the special district.

(C) The special district complies with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) prior to approving the lease.

(9) (A) Routine
 dredging activities that are necessary for maintenance of facilities operated by a special district.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “routine dredging activities” are limited to the following:

(i) Dredging to maintain the Stockton Deep Water Ship Channel at a depth of 40 feet in the sediment trap at the confluence of the San Joaquin River, between river mile 39.3 to river mile 40.2, and to maintain the remaining Stockton Deep Water Ship Channel at a depth of 35 feet plus two feet of overdredge from river mile 35 to river mile 43.

(ii) Dredging designed to maintain the Sacramento Deep Water Ship Channel at a depth of 30 feet plus two feet of overdredge from river mile 0.0 to river mile 30, and at a depth of 35 feet from river mile 35 to river mile 43.

(C) Except as provided by this subdivision, it is the intent of the Legislature that this exemption shall not be interpreted or treated as changing or modifying current substantive and procedural regulations applicable to the decision to approve dredging operations.

(c) For purposes of this section, “special district” means the Port of Stockton or the Port of West Sacramento.

(d) This section shall not be interpreted to authorize the abrogation of a vested right whether created by statute or by common law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 199.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

85058.

“Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta as defined in Section 12220 and the Suisun Marsh, as defined in Section 29101 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85059.

“Delta Plan” means the comprehensive, long-term management plan for the Delta as adopted by the council in accordance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85060.

“Delta watershed” means the Sacramento River Hydrologic Region and the San Joaquin River Hydrologic Region as described in the department’s Bulletin No. 160-05.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85064.

“Public water agency” means a public entity, as defined in Section 514, that provides water service, as defined in Section 515.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85066.

“Restoration” means the application of ecological principles to restore a degraded or fragmented ecosystem and return it to a condition in which its biological and structural components achieve a close approximation of its natural potential, taking into consideration the physical changes that have occurred in the past and the future impact of climate change and sea level rise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85067.

“Strategic Plan” means both the “Delta Vision Strategic Plan” issued by the Delta Vision Blue Ribbon Task Force on October 17, 2008, and the “Delta Vision Implementation Report” adopted by the Delta Vision Committee and dated December 31, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. EARLY ACTIONS [85080. - 85089.]

85080.

The council shall appoint a Delta Independent Science Board in accordance with Section 85280.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85082.

The council shall develop and implement a strategy to appropriately engage participation of the federal agencies with responsibilities in the Delta. This strategy shall include engaging these federal agencies to develop the Delta Plan consistent with the federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1451 et seq.), the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), and Section 8 of the federal Reclamation Act of 1902.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85084.

The council shall develop an interim plan that includes recommendations for early actions, projects, and programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85084.5.

The Department of Fish and Game, in consultation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service and the National Marine Fisheries Service and based on the best available science, shall develop and recommend to the board Delta flow criteria and quantifiable biological objectives for aquatic and terrestrial species of concern dependent on the Delta. The recommendations shall be developed no later than 12 months after the date of enactment of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85085.

The department shall do all of the following:

(a) Coordinate with the Department of Fish and Game, the board, the California regional water quality control boards, and the State Lands Commission efforts to cooperate with the United States Bureau of Reclamation to construct and implement the Two-Gates Fish Protection Demonstration Project by December 1, 2010.

(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of the Three Mile Slough Barrier project.

(c) Expeditiously move ahead with other near term actions as identified in the Strategic Plan.

(d) Assist in implementing early action ecosystem restoration projects, including, but not limited to, Dutch Slough tidal marsh restoration and Meins Island tidal marsh restoration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85086.

(a) The board shall establish an effective system of Delta watershed diversion data collection and public reporting by December 31, 2010.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish an accelerated process to determine instream flow needs of the Delta for the purposes of facilitating the planning decisions that are required to achieve the objectives of the Delta Plan.

(c) (1) For the purpose of informing planning decisions for the Delta Plan and the Bay Delta Conservation Plan, the board shall, pursuant to its public trust obligations, develop new flow criteria for the Delta ecosystem necessary to protect public trust resources. In carrying out this section, the board shall review existing water quality objectives and use the best available scientific information. The flow criteria for the Delta ecosystem shall include the volume, quality, and timing of water necessary for the Delta ecosystem under different conditions. The flow criteria shall be developed in a public process by the board within nine months of the enactment of this division. The public process shall be in the form of an informational proceeding conducted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 649) of Chapter 1.5 of Division 3 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations, and shall provide an opportunity for
 all interested persons to participate. The flow criteria shall not be considered predecisional with regard to any subsequent board consideration of a permit, including any permit in connection with a final BDCP.

(2) Any order approving a change in the point of diversion of the State Water Project or the federal Central Valley Project from the southern Delta to a point on the Sacramento River shall include appropriate Delta flow criteria and shall be informed by the analysis conducted pursuant to this section. The flow criteria shall be subject to modification over time based on a science-based adaptive management program that integrates scientific and monitoring results, including the contribution of habitat and other conservation measures, into ongoing Delta water management.

(3) Nothing in this section amends or otherwise affects the application of the board’s authority under
 Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 to include terms and conditions in permits that in its judgment will best develop, conserve, and utilize in the public interest the water sought to be appropriated.

(d) The board shall enter into an agreement with the State Water Project contractors and the federal Central Valley Project contractors, who rely on water exported from the Sacramento River watershed, or a joint powers authority comprised of those contractors, for reimbursement of the costs of the analysis conducted pursuant to this section.

(e) The board shall submit its flow criteria determinations pursuant to this section to the council for its information within 30 days of completing the determinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85087.

The board, by December 31, 2010, shall submit to the Legislature a prioritized schedule and estimate of costs to complete instream flow studies for the Delta and for high priority rivers and streams in the Delta watershed, not otherwise covered by Section 85086, by 2012, and for all major rivers and streams outside the Sacramento River watershed by 2018. In developing this schedule, the board shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game as to the timing of its submission of
 recommendations for instream flow needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85088.

Until the board issues an order approving a change in the point of diversion of the State Water Project and the federal Central Valley Project from the southern Delta to a point on the Sacramento River as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 85086, the department shall not commence construction of any diversion, conveyance, or other facility necessary to divert and convey water pursuant to the change in point of diversion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85089.

Construction of a new Delta conveyance facility shall not be initiated until the persons or entities that contract to receive water from the State Water Project and the federal Central Valley Project or a joint powers authority representing those entities have made arrangements or entered into contracts to pay for both of the following:

(a) The costs of the environmental review, planning, design, construction, and
 mitigation, including mitigation required pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000 of the Public Resources Code), required for the construction, operation, and maintenance of any new Delta water conveyance facility.

(b) Full mitigation of property tax or assessments levied by local governments or special districts for land used in the construction, location, mitigation, or operation of new Delta conveyance facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. DELTA GOVERNANCE [85200. - 85280.]



  CHAPTER 1. Delta Stewardship Council [85200. - 85204.]

85200.

(a) The Delta Stewardship Council is hereby established as an independent agency of the state.

(b) The council shall consist of seven voting members, of which four members shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate, one member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, one member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, and one member shall be the Chairperson of the Delta Protection Commission. Initial appointments to the council shall be made by July 1, 2010.

(c) (1) (A) The initial terms of two of the four members appointed by the Governor shall be four years.

(B) The initial terms of two of the four members appointed by the Governor shall be six years.

(C) The initial terms of the members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall be four years.

(D) Upon the expiration of each term described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), the term of each succeeding member shall be four years.

(2) The Chairperson of the Delta Protection Commission shall serve as a member of the council for the period during which he or she holds the position as commission chairperson.

(d) Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority within 60 days. If the term of a council member expires, and no successor is appointed within the
 allotted timeframe, the existing member may serve up to 180 days beyond the expiration of his or her term.

(e) The council members shall select a chairperson from among the members, who shall serve for not more than four years in that capacity.

(f) The council shall meet once a month in a public forum. At least two meetings each year shall take place at a location within the Delta.

(g) This section becomes operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 97) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 98.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

85201.

(a) The chairperson shall serve full time. Other members shall serve one-third time. The council may select a vice chairperson and other officers determined to be necessary.

(b) Each member of the council shall receive the salary provided for in Section 11564 of the Government Code.

(c) The members of the council shall be reimbursed for
 expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties.

(d) The council shall appoint an executive officer who shall serve full time at the pleasure of the council.

(e) The executive officer shall hire employees necessary to carry out council functions.

(f) The number of employees and qualifications of those employees shall be determined by the council, subject to the availability of funds.

(g) The salary of each employee of the council shall be determined by the State Personnel Board, and shall reflect the duties and responsibilities of the position.

(h) All persons employed by the council are state employees, subject to the duties, responsibilities, limitations, and benefits
 of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85202.

Council members shall possess diverse expertise and reflect a statewide perspective. It is the intent of the Legislature that the council appointees have knowledge about the Delta.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 324, Sec. 1.   (SB 650)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

85203.

The headquarters of the council shall be located in Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85204.

The council shall establish and oversee a committee of agencies responsible for implementing the Delta Plan. Each agency shall coordinate its actions pursuant to the Delta Plan with the council and the other relevant agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Mission, Duties, and Responsibilities of the Council [85210. - 85214.]

85210.

The council has all of the following powers:

(a) To sue or be sued.

(b) To enter into contracts.

(c) To employ the services of public, nonprofit, and private entities.

(d) To delegate administrative functions to council staff.

(e) To employ its own legal staff or contract with other state or federal agencies for legal services, or both. The council may employ special legal counsel with the approval of the Attorney General.

(f) To receive funds, including funds from private and local governmental sources, contributions from public and private sources, as well as state and federal appropriations.

(g) To disburse funds through grants, public assistance, loans, and contracts.

(h) To request reports from state, federal, and local governmental agencies on issues related to the implementation of the Delta Plan.

(i) To adopt regulations or guidelines as needed to carry out the powers and duties identified in this
 division.

(j) To comment on state agency environmental impact reports for projects outside the Delta that the council determines will have a significant impact on the Delta.

(k) To hold hearings in all parts of the state necessary to carry out the powers vested in it, and for those purposes has the powers conferred upon the heads of state departments pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Any hearing by the council may be conducted by any member of the council, or other designee, upon authorization of the council, and he or she shall have the powers granted to the council by this section, provided that any final action of the council shall be taken by a majority of the membership of the council at a meeting duly called and held.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85210.5.

A majority of the voting members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the council. A majority vote of the voting membership shall be required to take action with respect to any matter unless otherwise specified in this division. The vote of each member shall be individually recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85211.

The Delta Plan shall include performance measurements that will enable the council to track progress in meeting the objectives of the Delta Plan. The performance measurements shall include, but need not be limited to, quantitative or otherwise measurable assessments of the status and trends in all of the following:

(a) The health of the Delta’s estuary and wetland ecosystem for supporting viable populations of aquatic and
 terrestrial species, habitats, and processes, including viable populations of Delta fisheries and other aquatic organisms.

(b) The reliability of California water supply imported from the Sacramento River or the San Joaquin River watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85212.

The council shall review and provide timely advice to local and regional planning agencies regarding the consistency of local and regional planning documents, including sustainable communities strategies and alternative planning strategies prepared pursuant to Section 65080 of the Government Code, with the Delta Plan. The council’s input shall include, but not be limited to, reviewing the consistency of local and regional planning documents with the ecosystem restoration needs of the
 Delta and reviewing whether the lands set aside for natural resource protection are sufficient to meet the Delta’s ecosystem needs. A metropolitan planning organization preparing a regional transportation plan under Section 65080 of the Government Code that includes land within the primary or secondary zones of the Delta shall consult with the council early in the planning process regarding the issues and policy choices relating to the council’s advice. No later than 60 days prior to the adoption of a final regional transportation plan, the metropolitan planning organization shall provide the council with a draft sustainable communities strategy and an alternative planning strategy, if any. Concurrently, the metropolitan planning organization shall provide notice of its submission to the council in the same manner in which agencies file a certificate of consistency pursuant to Section 85225. If the council concludes that the draft sustainable communities strategy or alternative planning strategy is
 inconsistent with the Delta Plan, the council shall provide written notice of the claimed inconsistency to the metropolitan planning organization no later than 30 days prior to the adoption of the final regional transportation plan. If the council provides timely notice of a claimed inconsistency, the metropolitan planning organization’s adoption of the final regional transportation plan shall include a detailed response to the council’s notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85213.

(a) The council may contract for consultant services and architectural and engineering services to assist the council with all of the following functions:

(1) Preparation of the Delta Plan and associated environmental review.

(2) Performance of the council’s responsibilities, or the responsibilities of the Delta Independent Science Board, with respect to the Bay Delta Conservation Plan.

(3) Determination of the consistency of state and local public agency actions with the Delta Plan.

(4) Performance of
 scientific review to inform water and environmental decisionmaking in the Delta.

(b) The council shall contract for the services of the members of the Delta Independent Science Board established pursuant to Section 85280, at an hourly rate of one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The council shall increase the hourly rate annually based on inflation and cost of living adjustments.

(c) (1) Contracts entered into pursuant to this section for consultant services shall be
 exempt from Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to those laws. Contracts entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) for architectural and engineering services shall be entered into pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code, but are exempt from the requirement in Section 4526 of the Government Code to adopt regulations prior to contracting.

(2) The council shall not enter into a contract pursuant to subdivision (a) for consultant services unless at least three bids or proposals to do the work have been evaluated by a competitive process.

(3) The council shall establish procedures for contracting for services pursuant to this section, consistent with paragraphs (1) and (2). The procedures shall be exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 650, Sec. 1.   (SB 821)   Effective October 7, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

85214.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to avoid any actual or apparent conflict of interest with respect to contracts entered into by the council for work relating to the Delta Plan and the Bay Delta Conservation Plan.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that any contract entered into by the council for purposes of developing the Delta Plan should include provisions ensuring the independence of the contractor’s work on the Delta Plan with respect to any work that the contractor may do, or may have completed, related to the Bay Delta Conservation Plan.
